Texas, session 891, HB143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 251.001, Election Code, is amended by amending Subdivision (16) and adding Subdivision (22) to read as follows: (16)  "Political advertising" means a communication supporting or opposing a candidate for nomination or election to a public office or office of a political party, a political party, a public officer, or a measure that: (A)  in return for consideration, is published in a newspaper, magazine, or other periodical or is broadcast by radio or television or as part of a mass text message campaign; or (B)  appears: (i)  in a pamphlet, circular, flier, billboard or other sign, bumper sticker, or similar form of written communication; or (ii)  on an Internet website. (22)  "Mass text message campaign" means an organized effort in which a person sends a text message to multiple recipients in support of or opposition to a candidate, a political party, a public officer, or a measure and which involves an expenditure of funds for the messages that exceed the basic cost of hardware, messaging software, and bandwidth. SECTION 2.  Section 255.001, Election Code, is amended by adding Subsection (f) to read as follows: (f)  For purposes of assessing a civil penalty under Subsection (e), all text messages that are distributed or broadcast as part of a single mass text message campaign that violates this section constitute only one violation of this section. SECTION 3.  The changes in law made by this Act apply only to political advertising that is distributed or broadcast on or after the effective date of this Act. The distribution or broadcasting of political advertising before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect on the date the political advertising was distributed or broadcast, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.